Washington statutes.
RCW 19.52.900

Application—Construction—1981 c 78.

Chapter 78, Laws of 1981 shall apply only to loans or forbearances or transactions which are entered into after May 8, 1981, or to existing loans or forbearances, contracts or agreements which were not primarily for personal, family, or household use to which there is an addition to the principal amount of the credit outstanding after May 8, 1981: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing in chapter 78, Laws of 1981 shall be construed as implying that agricultural or investment purposes are not already included within the meaning of "commercial or business purposes" as used in RCW 19.52.080 as in effect prior to May 8, 1981.

[ 1989 c 8 s 2; 1981 c 78 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 78: See note following RCW 19.52.020.